Tennessee, session 114, SB0998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-2-103(b), is amended by deleting
"thirty (30) days" and substituting "thirty-five (35) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0998
002867
- 1 -